Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-505
Income other than taxes; to what funds credited.

All receipts derived from the county road fund shall be credited to the fund provided for the maintenance of parks. All receipts from franchises or royalties derived from lighting companies shall be credited to the funds for lighting streets and public grounds; and all receipts hereafter collected for permits issued by the engineering department or for paving repairs to streets shall be placed in, and credited to the fund for the department of public improvements. Such receipts shall be added to the maximum amounts that may be expended from such funds.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 4a, p. 470;

C.S.1922, § 3628;

C.S.1929, § 14-505;

R.S.1943, § 14-505.